West Virginia, session 2026, SB281.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. Authorization for Department of homeland Security to promulgate legislative rules. §64-6-1. Governor's Committee on Crime, Delinquency, and Correction. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-29-3 of this code, modified by the Governor's Committee on Crime, Delinquency, and Correction to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the Governor's Committee on Crime, Delinquency, and Correction (law-enforcement training and certification standards, 149 CSR 02), is authorized with the following amendment:On page 3, subdivision 3.3.1., by striking out the words “suspends or”. §64-6-2. Fire Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 3, 2025, authorized under the authority of §15A-11-3 of this code, modified by the Fire Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 6, 2025, relating to the Fire Commission (fire code, 87 CSR 01), is authorized. §64-6-3. State Emergency Response Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on January 8, 2025, authorized under the authority of §15-5A-5 of this code, modified by the State Emergency Response Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 13, 2025, relating to the State Emergency Response Commission (emergency planning and community right-to-know, 55 CSR 01), is authorized. §64-6-4. West Virginia State Police. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §15-2-5 of this code, modified by the West Virginia State Police to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the West Virginia State Police (West Virginia State Police Career Progression System, 81 CSR 03), is authorized. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §15-2-18 of this code, modified by the West Virginia State Police to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the West Virginia State Police (contracted police or security services, 81 CSR 05), is authorized. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §15-2-6 of this code, modified by the West Virginia State Police to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the West Virginia State Police (West Virginia State Police Member Grievance Procedure, 81 CSR 08), is authorized. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home